Utah statutes.
53B-18-102.   Purchases of land -- Equipment -- Personnel.

Utah State University is in charge of the experiment station, and shall purchase or lease suitable lands, erect necessary buildings, provide needed equipment, and appoint officers and assistants to conduct and issue reports on the research conducted at the station.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

